Illinois, session 104th, SB3482.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health Early Action on Campus Act is 5amended by adding Section 37 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 58/37 new)7    Sec. 37. Mental Health Council. The Board of Higher 8Education shall establish the Mental Health Council. The 9Council shall be comprised of no more than 6 public college or 10university students from different public colleges or 11universities in the State. Of the students, at least one shall 12be an LGBTQ-identified person, at least one shall be a woman, 13and at least one shall be a person of color. The Council 14members shall be appointed by the Board of Higher Education 15and shall reflect the racial, gender identity, sexual 16orientation, ability, socioeconomic, ethnic, and geographic 17diversity of the State, including rural, suburban, and urban 18appointees. The Council shall make recommendations to the 19Board of Higher Education regarding youth mental health, 20including, but not limited to, identifying barriers to youth 21feeling supported by and empowered by the system of mental 22health and treatment providers, barriers perceived by youth in 23accessing mental health services, gaps in the mental health   SB3482- 2 -LRB104 18108 LNS 31547 b1system, available resources in public colleges and 2universities, including youth's perceptions and experiences 3with outreach personnel, agency websites, and informational 4materials, methods to destigmatize mental health services, and 5how to improve State policy concerning student mental health. 6The Council shall meet at least 4 times annually.